test/german.sbl
/*
Copyright (c) 2001-2006, Dr Martin Porter and Richard Boulton. All rights
reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
are met:
1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
   documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
3. Neither the name of the Snowball project nor the names of its contributors
   may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software
   without specific prior written permission.

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND
ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR
ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES
(INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR SERVICES;
LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON
ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT
(INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE OF THIS
SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
*/


/*
    Extra rule for -nisse ending added 11 Dec 2009
*/

routines (
           prelude postlude
           mark_regions
           R1 R2
           standard_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 p2 x )

groupings ( v s_ending st_ending )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'
stringdef u"   hex 'FC'
stringdef ss   hex 'DF'

define v 'aeiouy{a"}{o"}{u"}'

define s_ending  'bdfghklmnrt'
define st_ending s_ending - 'r'

define prelude as (

    test repeat (
        (
            ['{ss}'] <- 'ss'
        ) or next
    )

    repeat goto (
        v [('u'] v <- 'U') or
           ('y'] v <- 'Y')
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    test(hop 3 setmark x)

    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try($p1 < x  $p1 = x)  // at least 3
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2

)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'Y'    (<- 'y')
        'U'    (<- 'u')
        '{a"}' (<- 'a')
        '{o"}' (<- 'o')
        '{u"}' (<- 'u')
        ''     (next)
    )

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define standard_suffix as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among(
                'em' 'ern' 'er'
                (   delete
                )
                'e' 'en' 'es'
                (   delete
                    try (['s'] 'nis' delete)
                )
                's'
                (   s_ending delete
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            [substring] R1 among(
                'en' 'er' 'est'
                (   delete
                )
                'st'
                (   st_ending hop 3 delete
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            [substring] R2 among(
                'end' 'ung'
                (   delete
                    try (['ig'] not 'e' R2 delete)
                )
                'ig' 'ik' 'isch'
                (   not 'e' delete
                )
                'lich' 'heit'
                (   delete
                    try (
                        ['er' or 'en'] R1 delete
                    )
                )
                'keit'
                (   delete
                    try (
                        [substring] R2 among(
                            'lich' 'ig'
                            (   delete
                            )
                        )
                    )
                )
            )
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards
        do standard_suffix
    do postlude
)
